District of Columbia statutes.
8-105.15

Authority to issue regulations.

The Board of Directors of WASA is authorized to issue regulations consistent with the authority granted to it by this subchapter, in order to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

History

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-95, § 16
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-106, § 2(j), 45 DCR 1724

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-105.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-965.